Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-2924
Sentences authorized.

Nothing in the Convicted Sex Offender Act shall be construed to prohibit a court from sentencing a person convicted of a crime identified in subdivision (2) of section 29-2923 to probation or community service or imposing any other sentence or condition allowed by law.

Laws 1992, LB 523, § 3.